Utah statutes.
75-2-514.   Contracts concerning succession.

(1)  A contract to make a will or devise, or not to revoke a will or devise, or to die intestate, if executed after July 1, 1998, may be established only by:

(a)  provisions of a will stating material provisions of the contract;

(b)  an express reference in a will to a contract and extrinsic evidence proving the terms of the contract; or

(c)  a writing signed by the decedent evidencing the contract.

(2)  The execution of a joint will or mutual wills does not create a presumption of a contract not to revoke the will or wills.



Enacted by Chapter 39, 1998 General Session

